District of Columbia statutes.
50-1731.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Distracted Driving Safety Act of 2004”.

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-124, § 1, 51 DCR 1541

History

Applicability date of D.C. Law 15-124: Section 11 of D.C. Law 15-124 provided: “This act shall apply as of July 1, 2004.”

Editor's Notes